apertium-pl-dsb.dsb.metadix
    <pardef n="jě/sć__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sć</l>
          <r>sć<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>m</l>
          <r>sć<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>š</l>
          <r>sć<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>sć<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mej</l>
          <r>sć<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>stej</l>
          <r>sć<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>stej</l>
          <r>sć<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>my</l>
          <r>sć<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sćo</l>
          <r>sć<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>źe</l>
          <r>sć<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dł</l>
          <r>sć<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dła</l>
          <r>sć<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dło</l>
          <r>sć<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dłej</l>
          <r>sć<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="past"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dli</l>
          <r>sć<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="zjě/sć__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sć</l>
          <r>sć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>m</l>
          <r>sć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>š</l>
          <r>sć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>sć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mej</l>
          <r>sć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>stej</l>
          <r>sć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>stej</l>
          <r>sć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>my</l>
          <r>sć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sćo</l>
          <r>sć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>źe</l>
          <r>sć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dł</l>
          <r>sć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dła</l>
          <r>sć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dło</l>
          <r>sć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dłej</l>
          <r>sć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="past"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dli</l>
          <r>sć<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <!-- plural only -->
    <pardef n="gód/y__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>am</l>
          <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ami</l>
          <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ach</l>
          <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="widlick/i__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ow</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>am</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ami</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ach</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="žn/i__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jow</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jam</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jami</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jach</l>
          <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sl/ě__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ě</l>
          <r>ě<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ow</l>
          <r>ě<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>am</l>
          <r>ě<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ě</l>
          <r>ě<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ami</l>
          <r>ě<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ach</l>
          <r>ě<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="jěsć"><i>jě</i><par n="jě/sć__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zjěsć"><i>zjě</i><par n="zjě/sć__vblex"/></e>
